Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256D.01, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Rulesnew text begin ; standard of assistancenew text end . The commissioner shall adopt rules to set standards of assistance and methods of calculating payment to conform with subdivision 1a. When a recipient is a resident of a licensed residential facility, except shelters for the homeless or shelters under section 611A.31, the recipient is not eligible for a full general assistance standard. The state standard of assistance for deleted text begin thosedeleted text end recipients whonew text begin reside in a licensed residential facility andnew text end have personal needs not otherwise provided for isnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) 70 percent of the general assistance standard for recipients receiving housing assistance under chapter 256I and residing in a licensed residential facility under section 256I.04, subdivision 2a, paragraph (a), clause (1) or (2); or new text end new text begin (2)new text end the personal needs allowance authorized for medical assistance recipients under section 256B.35new text begin for recipients residing in other licensed residential facilitiesnew text end .